lexc/verb/enhuige5.lexc
LEXICON Case8oe
+IndefSg1:^+cIndefSg1^§igeo§k    #;    ! ek/ok
!+IndefSg2:^+cIndefSg2^§szorelol§         #;    ! esz, el/ol
+IndefSg3:^+cIndefSg3^           #;    !
+IndefPl1:^+cIndefPl1^§igeu§nk   #;    ! ünk/unk
!+IndefPl2:^+cIndefPl2^t§igeo2§k  #;    ! tek/tok
!+IndefPl3:^+cIndefPl3^n§igea§k   #;    ! nek/nak
+DefSg1:^+cDefSg1^§igeo§m        #;    ! em/om
+DefSg2:^+cDefSg2^§igeo§d        #;    ! ed/od
+DefSg3:^+cDefSg3^§igeija1§       #;    ! i/sa
+DefPl1:^+cDefPl1^j§igeu§k       #;    ! jük/suk
+DefPl2:^+cDefPl2^§igejatokitek1§ #;    ! itek/sátok
+DefPl3:^+cDefPl3^§igejakik1§     #;    ! ik/sák
+ConjIndefSg1:^+cConjIndefSg1^§sj2§§igea§k     #;
+ConjIndefSg2:^+cConjIndefSg2^§sj2§§igeaa§l    #;
+ConjIndefSg2:^+cConjIndefSg2^§sj§ék          #;
+ConjIndefSg2:^+cConjIndefSg2^§sj2§           #;
+ConjIndefSg3:^+cConjIndefSg3^§sj2§§igeo§n     #;
+ConjIndefPl1:^+cConjIndefPl1^§sj2§§igeu§nk    #;
+ConjIndefPl2:^+cConjIndefPl2^§sj2§§igea§t§igeoe§k       #;
+ConjIndefPl3:^+cConjIndefPl3^§sj2§§igea§n§igea§k      #;
+ConjDefSg1:^+cConjDefSg1^§sj2§§igea§m         #;
+ConjDefSg2[lfea]:^+cConjDefSg2^§sj2§§igea§d         #;
+ConjDefSg2[lfea]:^+cConjDefSg2^§sj2§d              #;
+ConjDefSg3:^+cConjDefSg3^§sj2§§igea§          #;
+ConjDefPl1:^+cConjDefPl1^§sj2§§igeu§k         #;
+ConjDefPl2:^+cConjDefPl2^§sj2§§igeaa§t§igeoe§k     #;
+ConjDefPl3:^+cConjDefSg1^§sj2§§igeaa§k            #;
+IndefSg12:^+cIndefSgp12^§l§§igea§k           #;    !
+ConjDefSg12:^+cConjDefSgp12^§sj§§igea§l§igea§k          #;
!+PastDefSg12:^+cPDefSgp12^t§igea§l§igea§k               #;    ! ta/te
+CondDefSg12:^+cCDefSgp12^§igea§n§igeaa§l§igea§k                  #;    ! ná/né

LEXICON AddVerb7mely
[stem]+Verb[gcat]:0     Rep7mely;
[stem]+Verb[gcat]:0     Case8mely;

LEXICON Rep7mely
!+Inf11:^+ccInf11^n§igeomely§m #;
!+Inf12:^+ccInf12^n§igeomely§d #;
!+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AAmely§ #;
!+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeumely§nk #;
!+Inf22:^+ccInf22^n§igeomely§t§igeomely§k #;
!+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeumely§k #;
!+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
+Rep:^+cRep^§eomely§g§AAmely§t  Imper7mely;
                    Imper8mely;

LEXICON Imper7mely
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^n§igeoue§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^n§igeoue§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AA§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeu§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^n§igeoue§t§igeoue§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeu§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeuo§k #;
+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaamely§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AAmely§  #;
+Imper:^+cImp^t§AAmely§t  Nrep7mely;
                      Nrep9mely;
LEXICON Imper8mely
+Imper:^+cImp^§AAmely§t  Nrep7mely;
                      Nrep8mely;

LEXICON Nrep7mely
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^n§igeoue§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^n§igeoue§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AA§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeu§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^n§igeoue§t§igeoue§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeu§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeuo§k #;
+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaamely§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AAmely§  #;
+Rep:^+cNrep^g§AAmely§t  NImper7mely;
                      NImper9mely;
LEXICON Nrep9mely
+Rep:^+cNrep^g§AAmely§t  NImper7mely;
                      NImper9mely;
LEXICON Nrep8mely
+Rep:^+cNrep^§eomely§g§AAmely§t  NImper7mely;
                      NImper8mely;
LEXICON NImper7mely
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^n§igeoue§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^n§igeoue§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AA§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeu§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^n§igeoue§t§igeoue§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeu§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeuo§k #;
+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaamely§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AAmely§  #;
+Imper:^+cImp^t§AAmely§t  Pot7mely;
                      Pot9mely;
LEXICON NImper9mely
+Imper:^+cImp^t§AAmely§t  Pot7mely;
                      Pot9mely;
LEXICON NImper8mely
+Imper:^+cImp^§AAmely§t  Pot7mely;
                      Pot8mely;
LEXICON Pot7mely
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^n§igeoue§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^n§igeoue§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AA§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeu§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^n§igeoue§t§igeoue§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeu§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeuo§k #;
+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaamely§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AAmely§  #;
+Pot:^+cPot^h§AAAmely§t  AddInf7mely;
             Case7mely;
LEXICON Pot9mely
+Pot:^+cPot^h§AAAmely§t  AddInf7mely;
             Case7mely;
LEXICON Pot8mely
+Pot:^+cPot^h§AAAmely§t  AddInf7mely;
             Case8mely;

LEXICON AddInf7mely
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^n§igeoue§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^n§igeoue§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AA§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeu§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^n§igeoue§t§igeoue§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeu§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeuo§k #;
+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaamely§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AAmely§  #;
               Case7mely;
LEXICON Case7mely
+IndefSg1:^+cIndefSg1^§igeomely§k    #;    ! ek/ok
+IndefSg2:^+cIndefSg2^§szorelolmely§         #;    ! esz, el/ol
+IndefSg3:^+cIndefSg3^           #;    !
+IndefPl1:^+cIndefPl1^§igeumely§nk   #;    ! ünk/unk
+IndefPl2:^+cIndefPl2^t§igeo2mely§k  #;    ! tek/tok
+IndefPl3:^+cIndefPl3^n§igeamely§k   #;    ! nek/nak
+DefSg1:^+cDefSg1^§igeomely§m        #;    ! em/om
+DefSg2:^+cDefSg2^§igeomely§d        #;    ! ed/od
+DefSg3:^+cDefSg3^§igeija1mely§       #;    ! i/sa
+DefPl1:^+cDefPl1^j§igeumely§k       #;    ! jük/suk
+DefPl2:^+cDefPl2^§igejatokitek1mely§ #;    ! itek/sátok
+DefPl3:^+cDefPl3^§igejakik1mely§     #;    ! ik/sák
+ConjIndefSg1:^+cConjIndefSg1^§sj§§igeamely§k     #;
+ConjIndefSg2:^+cConjIndefSg2^§sj§§igeaamely§l    #;
+ConjIndefSg2:^+cConjIndefSg2^§sj§ék          #;
+ConjIndefSg2:^+cConjIndefSg2^§sj§           #;
+ConjIndefSg3:^+cConjIndefSg3^§sj§§igeomely§n     #;
+ConjIndefPl1:^+cConjIndefPl1^§sj§§igeumely§nk    #;
+ConjIndefPl2:^+cConjIndefPl2^§sj§§igeamely§t§igeomely§k       #;
+ConjIndefPl3:^+cConjIndefPl3^§sj§§igeamely§n§igeamely§k      #;
+ConjDefSg1:^+cConjDefSg1^§sj§§igeamely§m         #;
+ConjDefSg2[lfea]:^+cConjDefSg2^§sj§§igeamely§d         #;
+ConjDefSg2[lfea]:^+cConjDefSg2^§sj§d              #;
+ConjDefSg3:^+cConjDefSg3^§sj§§igeamely§          #;
+ConjDefPl1:^+cConjDefPl1^§sj§§igeumely§k         #;
+ConjDefPl2:^+cConjDefPl2^§sj§§igeaamely§t§igeomely§k     #;
+ConjDefPl3:^+cConjDefSg1^§sj§§igeaamely§k            #;
+PastIndefSg1:^+cPIndefSg1^t§AAmely§m            #;    ! tem/tam
+PastIndefSg2:^+cPIndefSg2^t§igeaamely§l         #;    ! tál/tél
+PastIndefSg3:^+cPIndefSg3^§igetattetmely§t      #;    ! t
+PastIndefPl1:^+cPIndefPl1^t§igeumely§nk         #;    ! tünk/tunk
+PastIndefPl2:^+cPIndefPl2^t§igeamely§t§igeo2mely§k  #;    ! tetek/tatok
+PastIndefPl3:^+cPIndefPl3^t§igeamely§k          #;    ! tek/tak
+PastDefSg1:^+cPDefSg1^t§igeamely§m              #;    ! tem/tam
+PastDefSg2:^+cPDefSg2^t§igeamely§d              #;    ! tad/ted
+PastDefSg3:^+cPDefSg3^t§igeamely§               #;    ! ta/te
+PastDefPl1:^+cPDefPl1^t§igeumely§k              #;    ! tuk/tük
+PastDefPl2:^+cPDefPl2^t§igeaamely§t§igeo2mely§k     #;    ! tátok/tétek
+PastDefPl3:^+cPDefPl3^t§igeaamely§k             #;    ! ták/ték
+CondIndefSg1:^+cCIndefSg1^nék               #;    ! nék
+CondIndefSg2:^+cCIndefSg1^n§igeaamely§l         #;    ! nál/nél
+CondIndefSg3:^+cCIndefSg1^n§igeamely§           #;    ! na/ne
+CondIndefPl1:^+cCIndefPl1^n§igeaamely§nk            #;    ! nánk/nénk
+CondIndefPl1:^+cCIndefPl1^n§igeoomely§k #;
+CondIndefPl2:^+cCIndefPl2^n§igeaamely§t§igeomely§k      #;    ! nátok/nétek
+CondIndefPl3:^+cCIndefPl3^n§igeaamely§n§igeamely§k      #;    ! nának/nének
+CondDefSg1:^+cCDefSg1^n§igeaamely§m                 #;    ! nám/ném
+CondDefSg2:^+cCDefSg1^n§igeaamely§d                 #;    ! nád/néd
+CondDefSg3:^+cCDefSg1^n§igeaamely§                  #;    ! ná/né
+CondDefPl1:^+cCDefPl1^n§igeaamely§nk                #;    ! nánk/nénk
+CondDefPl2:^+cCDefPl2^n§igeaamely§t§igeomely§k          #;    ! nátok/nétek
+CondDefPl3:^+cCDefPl3^n§igeaamely§k                 #;    ! nák/nék
+IndefSg12:^+cIndefSgp12^§l§§igeamely§k           #;    !
+ConjDefSg12:^+cConjDefSgp12^§sj§§igeamely§l§igeamely§k          #;
+PastDefSg12:^+cPDefSgp12^t§igeamely§l§igeamely§k               #;    ! ta/te
+CondDefSg12:^+cCDefSgp12^§igeamely§n§igeaamely§l§igeamely§k                  #;    ! ná/né

LEXICON Case8mely
+IndefSg1:^+cIndefSg1^§igeomely§k    #;    ! ek/ok
!+IndefSg2:^+cIndefSg2^§szorelolmely§        #;    ! esz, el/ol
+IndefSg3:^+cIndefSg3^           #;    !
+IndefPl1:^+cIndefPl1^§igeumely§nk   #;    ! ünk/unk
!+IndefPl2:^+cIndefPl2^t§igeo2mely§k  #;    ! tek/tok
!+IndefPl3:^+cIndefPl3^n§igeamely§k   #;    ! nek/nak
+DefSg1:^+cDefSg1^§igeomely§m        #;    ! em/om
+DefSg2:^+cDefSg2^§igeomely§d        #;    ! ed/od
+DefSg3:^+cDefSg3^§igeija1mely§       #;    ! i/sa
+DefPl1:^+cDefPl1^j§igeumely§k       #;    ! jük/suk
+DefPl2:^+cDefPl2^§igejatokitek1mely§ #;    ! itek/sátok
+DefPl3:^+cDefPl3^§igejakik1mely§     #;    ! ik/sák
+ConjIndefSg1:^+cConjIndefSg1^§sj2§§igeamely§k     #;
+ConjIndefSg2:^+cConjIndefSg2^§sj2§§igeaamely§l    #;
+ConjIndefSg2:^+cConjIndefSg2^§sj§ék          #;
+ConjIndefSg2:^+cConjIndefSg2^§sj2§           #;
+ConjIndefSg3:^+cConjIndefSg3^§sj2§§igeomely§n     #;
+ConjIndefPl1:^+cConjIndefPl1^§sj2§§igeumely§nk    #;
+ConjIndefPl2:^+cConjIndefPl2^§sj2§§igeamely§t§igeomely§k       #;
+ConjIndefPl3:^+cConjIndefPl3^§sj2§§igeamely§n§igeamely§k      #;
+ConjDefSg1:^+cConjDefSg1^§sj2§§igeamely§m         #;
+ConjDefSg2[lfea]:^+cConjDefSg2^§sj2§§igeamely§d         #;
+ConjDefSg2[lfea]:^+cConjDefSg2^§sj2§d              #;
+ConjDefSg3:^+cConjDefSg3^§sj2§§igeamely§          #;
+ConjDefPl1:^+cConjDefPl1^§sj2§§igeumely§k         #;
+ConjDefPl2:^+cConjDefPl2^§sj2§§igeaamely§t§igeomely§k     #;
+ConjDefPl3:^+cConjDefSg1^§sj2§§igeaamely§k            #;
+IndefSg12:^+cIndefSgp12^§l§§igeamely§k           #;    !
+ConjDefSg12:^+cConjDefSgp12^§sj§§igeamely§l§igeamely§k          #;
!+PastDefSg12:^+cPDefSgp12^t§igeamely§l§igeamely§k               #;    ! ta/te
+CondDefSg12:^+cCDefSgp12^§igeamely§n§igeaamely§l§igeamely§k                  #;    ! ná/né


LEXICON AddVerb10
[stem]+Verb[gcat]:0     Case10;
